Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-2125
Reciprocity; privilege to practice under compact; marriage and family therapist; licensed in another jurisdiction; military spouse; temporary license.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the department, with the recommendation of the board, may issue a license based on licensure in another jurisdiction to an individual who:

(a) Meets the licensure requirements of the Mental Health Practice Act or substantially equivalent requirements as determined by the department, with the recommendation of the board; or

(b) Has been in active practice in the appropriate discipline for at least five years following initial licensure or certification in another jurisdiction and has passed the Nebraska jurisprudence examination.

(2) The department may issue a license based on a privilege to practice in Nebraska under the Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact as provided in section 5 of such compact.

(3) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall, based on licensure in another jurisdiction, issue a mental health practitioner license or an independent mental health practitioner license to a marriage and family therapist who:

(a) Has a valid, independent, and unrestricted license as a marriage and family therapist in another state or territory that is in good standing with such state or territory;

(b) Completes an application and pays all applicable fees; and

(c) Has passed the Nebraska jurisprudence examination.

(4) An applicant for a license who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 742;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 65;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 39;

Laws 2022, LB752, § 17;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 1.

Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact, see section 38-4201.